Hawaii statutes.
§412:3-616 Authority for expedited
conversion, merger, consolidation, acquisition, or assumption. Upon
application of all participating financial institutions in a conversion,
merger, consolidation, acquisition or assumption, the commissioner may expedite
any application for conversion, merger, consolidation, acquisition, or
assumption pursuant to this part and order the transaction to take effect
immediately; provided that the financial institutions shall have complied with
any applicable federal law and provided that the commissioner finds that such
expedited action is necessary to protect the financial institutions'
depositors, beneficiaries, creditors, or shareholders, or the public. The
commissioner's findings shall be expressed in writing as part of the decision
and order approving the conversion, merger, consolidation, acquisition, or
assumption. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next